Hawaii statutes.
[§482-33] Remedies. (a) The owner of
a mark registered under this part may proceed by suit to enjoin the
manufacture, use, display, or sale of any counterfeits or imitations of the
mark, and any court of competent jurisdiction may grant injunctions to restrain
such manufacture, use, display, or sale as the court deems just and reasonable,
and may require the defendants to pay the owner all profits derived from and
all damages suffered by reason of such wrongful manufacture, use, display, or
sale; and the court may also order that any counterfeits or imitations in the
possession or under the control of any defendant in the case be delivered to an
officer of the court, or to the owner, to be destroyed. The court, in its
discretion, may enter judgment for an amount not to exceed three times the lost
profits and damages incurred by the owner, and award reasonable attorneys' fees
to the owner when the court finds that the defendants committed the wrongful
acts knowingly or in bad faith.

(b) The enumeration of any right or remedy
under this part shall not adversely affect a registrant's right to pursue
criminal penalties under other laws of this State. [L 2001, c 15, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next